Utah statutes.
16-10a-127.   Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.
A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by the division, or an
endorsement, seal, or stamp placed on the copy, which certificate,
endorsement, seal, or stamp bears the signature of the director of the
division, or a facsimile of the director's signature, and the seal of the
division, is conclusive evidence that the original document has been filed
with the division.
